Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.400

Building warden assisting others to evacuate building or attempting to control hazard—Immunity from liability.

No building warden, who acts in good faith, with or without compensation, shall be personally liable for civil damages arising from his or her negligent acts or omissions during the course of assigned duties in assisting others to evacuate industrial, commercial, governmental or multiunit residential buildings or in attempting to control or alleviate a hazard to the building or its occupants caused by fire, earthquake or other threat to life or limb. The term "building warden" means an individual who is assigned to take charge of the occupants on a floor or in an area of a building during an emergency in accordance with a predetermined fire safety or evacuation plan; and/or an individual selected by a municipal fire chief or the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, after an emergency is in progress to assist in evacuating the occupants of such a building or providing for their safety. This section shall not apply to any acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or wilful or wanton misconduct.

[ 1995 c 369 s 2; 1986 c 266 s 79; 1981 c 320 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.